Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 12. The Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative.

§§ 32.1-73.1 through 32.1-73.4.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 60.

Cross references.

As to the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative, see now §

51.5-178

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 60, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commonwealth Neurotrauma Initiative Advisory Board as appointed pursuant to § 32.1-73.3 shall be continued as provided in § 51.5-12.3.”

Acts 2002, c. 60, cl. 4 provides: “That the regulations of the Board of Health and the grant application, review, and award procedures established pursuant to Article 12 (§

32.1-73.1

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1 shall remain in force until the Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to this act.”